Utah statutes.
36-12-8.   Legislative Management Committee -- Research and General Counsel
Subcommittee -- Budget Subcommittee -- Audit Subcommittee -- Duties -- Members
-- Meetings.
(1) There is created within the Legislative Management Committee three
subcommittees having equal representation from each major political party. The
subcommittees, their membership, and their functions are as follows:
(a)  The Research and General Counsel Subcommittee, comprising six members,
shall recommend to the Legislative Management Committee a person or persons to
hold the positions of director of the Office of Legislative Research and
General Counsel and legislative general counsel.
(b)  The Budget Subcommittee, comprising six members, shall recommend to the
Legislative Management Committee a person to hold the position of legislative
fiscal analyst.
(c)  The Audit Subcommittee, comprising four members, shall:
(i) recommend to the Legislative Management Committee a person to hold the
position of legislative auditor general; and
(ii) (A)  review all requests for audits;
(B)  prioritize those requests; and
(C)  hear all audit reports and refer those reports to other legislative
committees for their further review and action as appropriate.
(2)  The members of each subcommittee of the Legislative Management Committee
shall be appointed from the membership of the Legislative Management Committee
by an appointments committee comprised of the speaker and the minority leader
of the House of Representatives and the president and the minority leader of
the Senate.
(3)  Each subcommittee of the Legislative Management Committee shall meet as
often as necessary to perform its duties. They may meet during and between
legislative sessions.
